Missouri, session 2026, SB1097.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Section 160.400, RSMo, is repealed and one new
2 section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 160.400,
3 to read as follows:
1 160.400. 1. A charter school is an independent public
2 school.
3 2. Except as further provided in subsection 4 of this
4 section, charter schools may be operated only:
5 (1) In a metropolitan school district, provided that:
6 (a) A charter school that was not established in a
7 metropolitan school district prior to August 28, 2026, shall
8 be ineligible to operate in a metropolitan school district
9 on August 28, 2026, or on any day thereafter,
10 notwithstanding any provision of this section to the
11 contrary; and
12 (b) The provisions of paragraph (a) of this
13 subdivision shall not apply to:
14 a. The renewal of an existing charter contract
15 pursuant to the provisions of section 160.405; or

SB 1097 2
16 b. The transfer of sponsorship of a charter school in
17 accordance with rules promulgated by the state board of
18 education;
19 (2) In an urban school district containing most or all
20 of a city with a population greater than three hundred fifty
21 thousand inhabitants;
22 (3) In a school district that has been classified as
23 unaccredited by the state board of education;
24 (4) In a school district that has been classified as
25 provisionally accredited by the state board of education and
26 has received scores on its annual performance report
27 consistent with a classification of provisionally accredited
28 or unaccredited for three consecutive school years beginning
29 with the 2012-13 accreditation year under the following
30 conditions:
31 (a) The eligibility for charter schools of any school
32 district whose provisional accreditation is based in whole
33 or in part on financial stress as defined in sections
34 161.520 to 161.529, or on financial hardship as defined by
35 rule of the state board of education, shall be decided by a
36 vote of the state board of education during the third
37 consecutive school year after the designation of provisional
38 accreditation; and
39 (b) The sponsor is limited to the local school board
40 or a sponsor who has met the standards of accountability and
41 performance as determined by the department based on
42 sections 160.400 to 160.425 and section 167.349 and properly
43 promulgated rules of the department;
44 (5) In a school district located within a county with
45 more than one hundred fifty thousand but fewer than two
46 hundred thousand inhabitants, provided that the provisions

SB 1097 3
47 of subsections 15 to 18 of section 160.415 shall not apply
48 to any charter school operated in such county; or
49 (6) In a school district that has been accredited
50 without provisions, sponsored only by the local school
51 board; provided that no board with a current year enrollment
52 of one thousand five hundred fifty students or greater shall
53 permit more than thirty-five percent of its student
54 enrollment to enroll in charter schools sponsored by the
55 local board under the authority of this subdivision, except
56 that this restriction shall not apply to any school district
57 that subsequently becomes eligible under subdivision (3) or
58 (4) of this subsection or to any district accredited without
59 provisions that sponsors charter schools prior to having a
60 current year student enrollment of one thousand five hundred
61 fifty students or greater.
62 3. Except as further provided in subsection 4 of this
63 section, the following entities are eligible to sponsor
64 charter schools:
65 (1) The school board of the district in any district
66 which is sponsoring a charter school as of August 27, 2012,
67 as permitted under subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 2 of
68 this section, the special administrative board of a
69 metropolitan school district during any time in which powers
70 granted to the district's board of education are vested in a
71 special administrative board, or if the state board of
72 education appoints a special administrative board to retain
73 the authority granted to the board of education of an urban
74 school district containing most or all of a city with a
75 population greater than three hundred fifty thousand
76 inhabitants, the special administrative board of such school
77 district;

SB 1097 4
78 (2) A public four-year college or university with an
79 approved teacher education program that meets regional or
80 national standards of accreditation;
81 (3) A community college, the service area of which
82 encompasses some portion of the district;
83 (4) Any private four-year college or university with
84 an enrollment of at least one thousand students, with its
85 primary campus in Missouri, and with an approved teacher
86 preparation program;
87 (5) Any two-year private vocational or technical
88 school designated as a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization
89 under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and
90 accredited by the Higher Learning Commission, with its
91 primary campus in Missouri;
92 (6) The Missouri charter public school commission
93 created in section 160.425.
94 4. Changes in a school district's accreditation status
95 that affect charter schools shall be addressed as follows,
96 except for the districts described in subdivisions (1) and
97 (2) of subsection 2 of this section:
98 (1) As a district transitions from unaccredited to
99 provisionally accredited, the district shall continue to
100 fall under the requirements for an unaccredited district
101 until it achieves three consecutive full school years of
102 provisional accreditation;
103 (2) As a district transitions from provisionally
104 accredited to full accreditation, the district shall
105 continue to fall under the requirements for a provisionally
106 accredited district until it achieves three consecutive full
107 school years of full accreditation;
108 (3) In any school district classified as unaccredited
109 or provisionally accredited where a charter school is

SB 1097 5
110 operating and is sponsored by an entity other than the local
111 school board, when the school district becomes classified as
112 accredited without provisions, a charter school may continue
113 to be sponsored by the entity sponsoring it prior to the
114 classification of accredited without provisions and shall
115 not be limited to the local school board as a sponsor.
116 A charter school operating in a school district identified
117 in subdivision (1), (2), or (5) of subsection 2 of this
118 section may be sponsored by any of the entities identified
119 in subsection 3 of this section, irrespective of the
120 accreditation classification of the district in which it is
121 located. A charter school in a district described in this
122 subsection whose charter provides for the addition of grade
123 levels in subsequent years may continue to add levels until
124 the planned expansion is complete to the extent of grade
125 levels in comparable schools of the district in which the
126 charter school is operated.
127 5. The mayor of a city not within a county may request
128 a sponsor under subdivision (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6) of
129 subsection 3 of this section to consider sponsoring a
130 "workplace charter school", which is defined for purposes of
131 sections 160.400 to 160.425 as a charter school with the
132 ability to target prospective students whose parent or
133 parents are employed in a business district, as defined in
134 the charter, which is located in the city.
135 6. No sponsor shall receive from an applicant for a
136 charter school any fee of any type for the consideration of
137 a charter, nor may a sponsor condition its consideration of
138 a charter on the promise of future payment of any kind.
139 7. The charter school shall be organized as a Missouri
140 nonprofit corporation incorporated pursuant to chapter 355.

SB 1097 6
141 The charter provided for herein shall constitute a contract
142 between the sponsor and the charter school.
143 8. As a nonprofit corporation incorporated pursuant to
144 chapter 355, the charter school shall select the method for
145 election of officers pursuant to section 355.326 based on
146 the class of corporation selected. Meetings of the
147 governing board of the charter school shall be subject to
148 the provisions of sections 610.010 to 610.030.
149 9. A sponsor of a charter school, its agents and
150 employees are not liable for any acts or omissions of a
151 charter school that it sponsors, including acts or omissions
152 relating to the charter submitted by the charter school, the
153 operation of the charter school and the performance of the
154 charter school.
155 10. A charter school may affiliate with a four-year
156 college or university, including a private college or
157 university, or a community college as otherwise specified in
158 subsection 3 of this section when its charter is granted by
159 a sponsor other than such college, university or community
160 college. Affiliation status recognizes a relationship
161 between the charter school and the college or university for
162 purposes of teacher training and staff development,
163 curriculum and assessment development, use of physical
164 facilities owned by or rented on behalf of the college or
165 university, and other similar purposes. A university,
166 college or community college may not charge or accept a fee
167 for affiliation status.
168 11. The expenses associated with sponsorship of
169 charter schools shall be defrayed by the department of
170 elementary and secondary education retaining one and five-
171 tenths percent of the amount of state and local funding
172 allocated to the charter school under section 160.415, not

SB 1097 7
173 to exceed one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars, adjusted
174 for inflation. The department of elementary and secondary
175 education shall remit the retained funds for each charter
176 school to the school's sponsor, provided the sponsor remains
177 in good standing by fulfilling its sponsorship obligations
178 under sections 160.400 to 160.425 and 167.349 with regard to
179 each charter school it sponsors, including appropriate
180 demonstration of the following:
181 (1) Expends no less than ninety percent of its charter
182 school sponsorship funds in support of its charter school
183 sponsorship program, or as a direct investment in the
184 sponsored schools;
185 (2) Maintains a comprehensive application process that
186 follows fair procedures and rigorous criteria and grants
187 charters only to those developers who demonstrate strong
188 capacity for establishing and operating a quality charter
189 school;
190 (3) Negotiates contracts with charter schools that
191 clearly articulate the rights and responsibilities of each
192 party regarding school autonomy, expected outcomes, measures
193 for evaluating success or failure, performance consequences
194 based on the annual performance report, and other material
195 terms;
196 (4) Conducts contract oversight that evaluates
197 performance, monitors compliance, informs intervention and
198 renewal decisions, and ensures autonomy provided under
199 applicable law; and
200 (5) Designs and implements a transparent and rigorous
201 process that uses comprehensive data to make merit-based
202 renewal decisions.
203 12. Sponsors receiving funds under subsection 11 of
204 this section shall be required to submit annual reports to

SB 1097 8
205 the joint committee on education demonstrating they are in
206 compliance with subsection 17 of this section.
207 13. No university, college or community college shall
208 grant a charter to a nonprofit corporation if an employee of
209 the university, college or community college is a member of
210 the corporation's board of directors.
211 14. No sponsor shall grant a charter under sections
212 160.400 to 160.425 and 167.349 without ensuring that a
213 criminal background check and family care safety registry
214 check are conducted for all members of the governing board
215 of the charter schools or the incorporators of the charter
216 school if initial directors are not named in the articles of
217 incorporation, nor shall a sponsor renew a charter without
218 ensuring a criminal background check and family care safety
219 registry check are conducted for each member of the
220 governing board of the charter school.
221 15. No member of the governing board of a charter
222 school shall hold any office or employment from the board or
223 the charter school while serving as a member, nor shall the
224 member have any substantial interest, as defined in section
225 105.450, in any entity employed by or contracting with the
226 board. No board member shall be an employee of a company
227 that provides substantial services to the charter school.
228 All members of the governing board of the charter school
229 shall be considered decision-making public servants as
230 defined in section 105.450 for the purposes of the financial
231 disclosure requirements contained in sections 105.483,
232 105.485, 105.487, and 105.489.
233 16. A sponsor shall develop the policies and
234 procedures for:
235 (1) The review of a charter school proposal including
236 an application that provides sufficient information for

SB 1097 9
237 rigorous evaluation of the proposed charter and provides
238 clear documentation that the education program and academic
239 program are aligned with the state standards and grade-level
240 expectations, and provides clear documentation of effective
241 governance and management structures, and a sustainable
242 operational plan;
243 (2) The granting of a charter;
244 (3) The performance contract that the sponsor will use
245 to evaluate the performance of charter schools. Charter
246 schools shall meet current state academic performance
247 standards as well as other standards agreed upon by the
248 sponsor and the charter school in the performance contract;
249 (4) The sponsor's intervention, renewal, and
250 revocation policies, including the conditions under which
251 the charter sponsor may intervene in the operation of the
252 charter school, along with actions and consequences that may
253 ensue, and the conditions for renewal of the charter at the
254 end of the term, consistent with subsections 8 and 9 of
255 section 160.405;
256 (5) Additional criteria that the sponsor will use for
257 ongoing oversight of the charter; and
258 (6) Procedures to be implemented if a charter school
259 should close, consistent with the provisions of subdivision
260 (15) of subsection 1 of section 160.405.
261 The department shall provide guidance to sponsors in
262 developing such policies and procedures.
263 17. (1) A sponsor shall provide timely submission to
264 the state board of education of all data necessary to
265 demonstrate that the sponsor is in material compliance with
266 all requirements of sections 160.400 to 160.425 and section
267 167.349. The state board of education shall ensure each

SB 1097 10
268 sponsor is in compliance with all requirements under
269 sections 160.400 to 160.425 and 167.349 for each charter
270 school sponsored by any sponsor. The state board shall
271 notify each sponsor of the standards for sponsorship of
272 charter schools, delineating both what is mandated by
273 statute and what best practices dictate. The state board
274 shall evaluate sponsors to determine compliance with these
275 standards every three years. The evaluation shall include a
276 sponsor's policies and procedures in the areas of charter
277 application approval; required charter agreement terms and
278 content; sponsor performance evaluation and compliance
279 monitoring; and charter renewal, intervention, and
280 revocation decisions. Nothing shall preclude the department
281 from undertaking an evaluation at any time for cause.
282 (2) If the department determines that a sponsor is in
283 material noncompliance with its sponsorship duties, the
284 sponsor shall be notified and given reasonable time for
285 remediation. If remediation does not address the compliance
286 issues identified by the department, the commissioner of
287 education shall conduct a public hearing and thereafter
288 provide notice to the charter sponsor of corrective action
289 that will be recommended to the state board of education.
290 Corrective action by the department may include withholding
291 the sponsor's funding and suspending the sponsor's authority
292 to sponsor a school that it currently sponsors or to sponsor
293 any additional school until the sponsor is reauthorized by
294 the state board of education under section 160.403.
295 (3) The charter sponsor may, within thirty days of
296 receipt of the notice of the commissioner's recommendation,
297 provide a written statement and other documentation to show
298 cause as to why that action should not be taken. Final
299 determination of corrective action shall be determined by

SB 1097 11
300 the state board of education based upon a review of the
301 documentation submitted to the department and the charter
302 sponsor.
303 (4) If the state board removes the authority to
304 sponsor a currently operating charter school under any
305 provision of law, the Missouri charter public school
306 commission shall become the sponsor of the school.
307 18. If a sponsor notifies a charter school of closure
308 under subsection 8 of section 160.405, the department of
309 elementary and secondary education shall exercise its
310 financial withholding authority under subsection 12 of
311 section 160.415 to assure all obligations of the charter
312 school shall be met. The state, charter sponsor, or
313 resident district shall not be liable for any outstanding
314 liability or obligations of the charter school.
✓